Utah statutes.
70C-4-104.   Redundant delinquency charges prohibited.

With respect to an open-end account, no delinquency charge may be assessed on a payment that is otherwise a payment in full for the applicable period solely because of an unpaid delinquency charge relating to an earlier installment.

